Utah statutes.
17-19-13.   Seal.

The county auditor shall have a seal, to be furnished by the  county legislative body, the impression of which shall contain the following words: "State of Utah, County Auditor," together with the name of the county in which the same is to be used.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

